Washington statutes.
RCW 19.29.050

Violation of rules by public service company or political subdivision—Penalty.

Every public service company, county, city, or other political subdivision of the state of Washington, and all officers, agents and employees of any public service company, county, city, or other political subdivision of the state of Washington, shall obey, observe and comply with every order, rule, direction or requirement made by the commission [director of labor and industries] under authority of this chapter, so long as the same shall be and remain in force. Any public service company, county, city, or other political subdivision of the state of Washington, which shall violate or fail to comply with any provision of this chapter, or which fails, omits or neglects to obey, observe or comply with any order, rule, or any direction, demand or requirement of the commission [director of labor and industries], pursuant to this chapter, shall be subject to a penalty of not to exceed the sum of one thousand dollars for each and every offense. Every violation of any such order, direction or requirement of this chapter shall be a separate and distinct offense, and in case of a continued violation every day's continuance thereof shall be and be deemed to be a separate and distinct offense.

[ 1913 c 130 s 5; RRS s 5439.] [1954 SLC-RO-29.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: (1) Duties of the public service commission devolved on director of labor and industries. 1921 c 7 s 80(5) relating to powers and duties of the director of labor and industries reads: "(5) To exercise all the powers and perform all the duties in relation to the enforcement, amendment, alteration, change, and making additions to rules and regulations concerning the operation, placing, erection, maintenance, and use of electrical apparatus, and the construction thereof, now vested in, and required to be performed by, the public service commission;". See also RCW 43.22.050(3).

(2) Name of "public service commission" changed to "utilities and transportation commission" by 1961 c 290 s 1.